Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Control Share Acquisitions

§ 17-18-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Acquiring person” means a person who makes or proposes to make a control share acquisition. If two (2) or more persons act as a partnership, limited partnership, syndicate or other group pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, relationship, understanding or otherwise, whether or not in writing, for the purposes of acquiring, owning or voting shares of an issuing public corporation, all members of the partnership, syndicate or other group constitute a person;

“Control shares” means shares that, except for this article, would have voting power with respect to shares of an issuing public corporation that, when added to all other shares of the issuing public corporation owned by a person or with respect to which that person may exercise or direct the exercise of voting power, would entitle that person, immediately after acquisition of the shares directly or indirectly, alone or as a part of a group, to exercise or direct the exercise of the voting power of the issuing public corporation in the election of directors within any of the following ranges of voting power:

One-fifth (1/5) or more but less than one-third (1/3) of all voting power;

One-third (1/3) or more but less than a majority of all voting power; or

A majority or more of all voting power.

“Control share acquisition” means the acquisition directly or indirectly by any person of ownership of, or the power to direct the exercise of voting power with respect to, issued and outstanding control shares. Shares acquired within ninety (90) days or shares acquired pursuant to a plan to make a control share acquisition are considered to have been acquired in the same acquisition. Control share acquisition does not include the acquisition of shares:

In the ordinary course of business for the benefit of others if:

They are acquired in good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this article; and

The person who acquires the shares is not able to exercise or direct the exercise of votes without further instruction from others.

Of an issuing public corporation consummated:

Before July 1, 1990;

Pursuant to a contract existing before July 1, 1990;

Pursuant to a transfer by gift, will or the laws of descent and distribution;

Pursuant to the satisfaction of a pledge or other security interest created in good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this article;

Pursuant to a merger, share exchange or consolidation effected in compliance with W.S.

17-16-1101

through

17-16-1114

or an agreement or plan for a merger, share exchange or consolidation, if the issuing public corporation is a party to the agreement or plan of merger, share exchange or consolidation;

Pursuant to a transfer of shares by the issuing public corporation to its shareholders in the form of a dividend on a class or series of the issuing public corporation’s outstanding shares;

Pursuant to an order or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction;

Pursuant to a transfer to a plan or trust for the benefit of employees of the issuing public corporation;

Pursuant to a direct issue by or transfer from the issuing public corporation of its own shares, other than shares issued or transferred upon the conversion of a convertible security or on the exercise of an option, warrant or other right to purchase shares unless the convertible security, option, warrant or other right was acquired directly from the corporation by the acquiring person; or

In good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this article, by a person whose voting rights over control shares have been authorized under W.S.

17-18-306

, if the person’s voting power after the acquisition would be within the same range of voting power previously authorized under W.S.

17-18-306

for the person.

“Interested shares” means the shares of an issuing public corporation of which any of the following persons may exercise or direct the exercise of the voting power of the corporation in the election of directors:

An acquiring person;

Any officer of the issuing public corporation or of the acquiring person; or

Any employee of the issuing public corporation or of the acquiring person who is also a director of the corporation or of the acquiring person, except shares over which a plan or trust for the benefit of employees of the corporation or of the acquiring person has voting power are not interested shares except to the extent the voting of the shares is directed by the employee.

“Issuing public corporation” means a qualified corporation as defined by W.S. 17-18-102(b)(xii);

“Range of voting power” means a range of voting power provided by paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

“Voting power” means the sole or shared power to vote or direct the voting of shares, directly or indirectly, other than under an immediately revocable proxy that authorizes the person named proxy to vote at a meeting of shareholders that was called before the proxy is delivered or at an adjournment of the meeting.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-18-302.
Control share voting rights.

Control shares of an issuing public corporation acquired in a control share acquisition do not have voting rights unless conferred by a vote of shareholders pursuant to W.S.

17-18-306

.

Control shares for which voting rights have not been conferred under W.S.

17-18-306

are not considered outstanding shares for the purposes of determining whether a quorum is present or whether an action requiring the affirmative vote of the holders of a specified percentage of the corporation’s outstanding shares has received the requisite affirmative vote.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 17-18-303.
Notice of control share acquisition; acquiring person statement.

Any person who proposes to make a control share acquisition may, and any person who has made a control share acquisition shall, deliver an acquiring person statement to the issuing public corporation at the issuing public corporation’s principal office. The acquiring person statement shall contain the following:

The identity of the acquiring person, including the identity of each member of any partnership, limited partnership, syndicate or other group which constitutes a part of the acquiring person for purposes of W.S. 17-18-301(a)(i);

A statement that the acquiring person statement is delivered pursuant to this article;

A statement of the number of shares of the issuing public corporation owned directly or indirectly by the acquiring person or with respect to which the acquiring person may exercise or direct the exercise of voting power;

The range of voting power for which the acquiring person seeks voting rights; and

Any undertaking to pay expenses made pursuant to W.S. 17-18-304(a) or any requests made pursuant to W.S. 17-18-304(d).

If the control share acquisition has not taken place the acquiring person statement shall, in addition to the requirements stated in subsection (a) of this section, contain:

A description in reasonable detail of the terms and conditions of the proposed control share acquisition, including without limitation the amount and class or classes of shares to be acquired, the price or prices to be offered for the shares and the form of the consideration to be offered; and

Representations by the acquiring person, together with a statement in reasonable detail of the facts upon which they are based and other supporting evidence reasonably sufficient to establish the representations, that:

The proposed control share acquisition will not be contrary to law;

The acquiring person has the financial capacity to make, and will make, the proposed control share acquisition forthwith after the shareholder vote if voting rights are accorded.

An affidavit of the acquiring person that:

States that the acquiring person statement contains all of the information required by this section;

States that the information contained in the acquiring person statement is true, correct and complete; and

Is signed by the acquiring person if the acquiring person is an individual or by the chief executive officer or similar representative of the acquiring person if the acquiring person is not an individual.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 17-18-304.
Shareholder special meeting.

If the acquiring person requests a special meeting at the time of delivery of an acquiring person statement pursuant to W.S.

17-18-303

and agrees to pay the corporation’s expenses of a special meeting, the directors of the issuing public corporation shall call a special meeting of shareholders of the issuing public corporation within ten (10) days after the date of the corporation’s receipt of the request for the purpose of considering whether the shares acquired or to be acquired in the control share acquisition will be accorded voting rights.

Unless the acquiring person agrees in writing to another date, a special meeting of shareholders shall be held within fifty (50) days after receipt by the issuing public corporation of the request.

If no request is made for a special meeting, the issue of whether the shares acquired in the control share acquisition will be accorded voting rights shall be presented at the next special or annual meeting of shareholders.

If requested in writing by the acquiring person when the acquiring person statement is delivered pursuant to W.S.

17-18-303

, the special meeting shall not be held sooner than thirty (30) days after receipt by the issuing public corporation of the acquiring person statement.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 17-18-305.
Notice of shareholder meeting.

The issuing public corporation shall give notice of a special meeting of shareholders requested pursuant to W.S.

17-18-304

as promptly as practicable to each shareholder of record as of the record date set for the meeting, whether or not the shareholder is entitled to vote at the meeting.

Notice of the special or annual shareholder meeting at which the voting rights are to be considered shall include or be accompanied by:

A copy of the acquiring person statement delivered to the issuing public corporation pursuant to this article; and

A statement by the board of directors of the issuing public corporation which:

Is authorized by its directors; and

Contains the position or recommendation of the board of directors or states that the board of directors takes no position or makes no recommendation concerning the proposed control share acquisition; and

Contains a statement of any dissenters’ rights accorded to shareholders of the issuing public corporation under W.S.

17-18-308

.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 17-18-306.
Voting rights; resolution.

Control shares acquired in a control share acquisition have the same voting rights accorded the shares before the control share acquisition only to the extent granted by resolution approved by the shareholders of the issuing public corporation.

The resolution required by subsection (a) of this section shall be approved both by a majority of:

All outstanding voting shares, including interested shares; and

All outstanding shares, excluding interested shares.

In addition to the vote required by subsection (b) of this section, in the event the holders of the outstanding shares of a class are entitled to vote as a separate voting group and the proposed control share acquisition would, if fully carried out, result in any of the changes described in W.S. 17-16-1004(a), the resolution required by subsection (a) of this section shall be approved both by:

Each voting group entitled to vote separately on a proposal by a majority of all votes entitled to be cast by that voting group, including all interested shares; and

Each voting group entitled to vote separately on a proposal by a majority vote of all the votes entitled to be cast by that voting group excluding all interested shares.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 17-18-307.
Redemption.

Control shares acquired in a control share acquisition may be redeemed by the corporation at fair value pursuant to the procedures adopted by the corporation at any time during the period ending sixty (60) days after the last acquisition of control shares by the acquiring person if the control shares are not accorded voting rights by the shareholders pursuant to W.S.

17-18-306

.

For purposes of this section, the procedures to be adopted by the corporation for determining the fair value to be paid for a share upon redemption are not required to take into account and may expressly disregard any increase or proposal for any increase in the price of the shares following the announcement or commencement of the control share acquisition or any proposal. The provisions of W.S. 17-18-308(b) do not apply to this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a control share acquisition to which the provisions of this article otherwise apply if, at the time the issuing public corporation receives an acquiring person statement with respect to the control share acquisition, the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the issuing public corporation contain a provision expressly electing not to be governed by this section.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 17-18-308.
Rights of dissenters; “fair value” defined.

A shareholder of the issuing public corporation, other than the acquiring person, who does not vote in favor of the control share acquisition may dissent from any proposal to accord voting rights to the control shares over which voting power was or is to be acquired in the control share acquisition. Each shareholder dissenting from the proposal is entitled to receive the fair value of the shareholder’s shares under W.S.

17-16-1301

through

17-16-1331

if the control shares acquired or to be acquired in the control share acquisition are accorded voting rights under W.S.

17-18-306

and the acquiring person has or is authorized to have a majority of all voting power.

For purposes of this section, the fair value to be paid for a share of a dissenting shareholder may not be less than the highest price paid for a share by the acquiring person in the control share acquisition.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a control share acquisition to which the provisions of this article otherwise apply if, at the time the issuing public corporation receives an acquiring person statement with respect to the control share acquisition, the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the issuing public corporation contain a provision expressly electing not to be governed by this section.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.

§ 17-18-309.
Application.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to a control share acquisition if, at the time the issuing public corporation receives an acquiring person statement with respect to the control share acquisition, the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the issuing public corporation contain a provision expressly electing not to be governed by this article.

A corporation which is not an issuing public corporation may provide in its articles of incorporation or bylaws that this article does not apply to control share acquisitions of shares of the corporation in the event it becomes an issuing public corporation.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 62, § 1.